Nebraska, session 109, LB239.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB239 LB239
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 83-1216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1216 (1) The department shall administer the medicaid home and
community-based services waivers upon application approval by the federal
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The amount of funding for any
person receiving services shall be determined using an objective
assessment process developed by the department and approved by the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The objective
assessment formula shall be published on the department's website and
shall be subject to approval by the Governor's developmental disability
advisory board or the interested parties stakeholder group as required by
the access rule. The tool shall not decrease an individual's budget to
the point that the individual is removed from a setting. Residential
settings shall be provided as an option to those in funding priority one,
two, three, and five. Residential settings shall also be an option for
those in funding priority four and six under the consideration of the
objective assessment process. A request for a redetermination from an
individual, family member, or guardian under this tool shall be completed
within thirty days. The objective assessment process shall be person-
centered and designed with consideration of the individual support plan
developed for the individual. The objective assessment process shall have
an independent mediated review process which shall be administered
outside the department.
(2) The department shall provide directly or by contract service
coordination to Nebraska residents found to be eligible for specialized
services. The individual or legal representative shall decide the entity
that provides such specialized services.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department take all
possible steps to maximize federal funding. All Nebraska residents
eligible for funding for specialized services through the department
shall apply for and accept any federal medicaid benefits for which they
-2-

LB239 LB239
2025 2025
may be eligible and benefits from other funding sources within the
department, the State Department of Education, specifically including the
Division of Rehabilitation Services, and other agencies to the maximum
extent possible.
(4) The priorities for funding the medicaid home and community-based
services waivers under this section are as follows:
(a) The first funding priority of the state shall be responding to
the needs of persons with developmental disabilities in immediate crisis
due to caregiver death, homelessness, or a threat to the life and safety
of the person, family member, or others residing in the same household,
or the general public. The department shall create a form and process for
an expedited request for consideration of funding priority one status.
The department shall respond to this form within five calendar days of
the date of original submission;
(b) The second funding priority of the state in responding to the
needs of persons with developmental disabilities shall be for persons
that have resided in an institutional setting for a period of at least
two twelve consecutive months and who are requesting community-based
services and those persons who are at risk for placement in juvenile
detention centers;
(c) The third funding priority of the state in responding to the
needs of persons with developmental disabilities shall be for serving
wards of the department or persons who have ever been placed under the
supervision of the Office of Probation Administration by the Nebraska
court system who are transitioning upon age nineteen with no other
alternatives as determined by the department to support residential
services necessary to pursue economic self-sufficiency;
(d) The fourth funding priority of the state in responding to the
needs of persons with developmental disabilities shall be for serving
persons at any point after transitioning from the education system upon
attaining eighteen twenty-one years of age or who have departed the
-3-

LB239 LB239
2025 2025
education system to maintain skills and receive the day services
necessary to pursue economic self-sufficiency or independence consistent
with such person's abilities;
(e) The fifth funding priority of the state in responding to the
needs of persons with developmental disabilities shall be, upon approval
by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services, for serving a dependent of a
member of the armed forces of the United States who is a legal resident
of this state due to the service member's military assignment in
Nebraska; and
(f) The sixth funding priority of the state in responding to the
needs of persons with developmental disabilities shall be for serving all
other persons by date of application.
Sec. 2. Section 83-1216.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1216.02 (1) If the department determines that there are not
enough funds available to provide services to all eligible individuals
under subdivision (4)(d) of section 83-1216, the department shall provide
day services to individuals who:
(a) Are transitioning from the education system upon attaining
twenty-one years of age on or after July 1, 2019; and
(b) Are determined by the department to be otherwise eligible for
the day services in accordance with the Developmental Disabilities
Services Act.
(2) The department shall provide services comparable to the day
services the individual would have received pursuant to subdivision (4)
(d) of section 83-1216 if funds were available.
(3) No later than September 15 of each year, the director shall
provide electronic notification to the Health and Human Services
Committee of the Legislature and the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature of the estimated number of individuals needing services under
-4-

LB239 LB239
2025 2025
subsection (4) of section 83-1216 and the net additional resources
necessary to provide services to all eligible individuals under
subsection (4) of section 83-1216 other than subdivision (f) of such
subsection.
(4) This section terminates June 30, 2025.
Sec. 3. Original sections 83-1216 and 83-1216.02, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-